Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4669.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 8 of Chapter 150 of the Acts of 2024 is hereby amended by removing the period
at the end of the sentence ending with “Chapter 64G” and adding:-
;provided further that an accessory dwelling unit on a lot of not more than 10,000 square
feet shall be subject to no more than a five-foot side and rear setback, a five-foot separation
between detached structures, and shall be exempt from any lot coverage or open space
requirement.
of 1